Hawaii statutes.
§621-13 Oaths, validity of. If an oath
has been administered by a judge of a court of record, or by a clerk, notary
public, or other person having authority to administer oaths by the law of the
place where the oath was administered, it shall not be an objection to the
validity of the oath that the judge or other person has not jurisdiction or
cognizance of the matter or thing concerning which the oath was administered.
[L 1876, c 32, §65; RL 1925, §2631; RL 1935, §3822; RL 1945, §9833; RL 1955,
§222-13; HRS §621-13; am L 1972, c 104, §1(h)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next